Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 64.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Coroners shall receive out of the county, consolidated local government,
charter county government, urban-county government, or unified local
government treasury, whichever is appropriate, the annual[monthly]
compensation the fiscal court of each county shall fix, subject to this
subsection.[the following minimums:]
(b) 1. The salary schedule for coroners in subparagraph 2.b. of this
paragraph provides for nine (9) levels of minimum salaries based
upon the population of the county in the year prior to the election of
the coroner. To implement the salary schedule, the Department for
Local Government shall, by November 1 of each year preceding the
election of the coroner, certify for each county the population group
applicable to each county based on the most recent estimates of the
United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census. The
salary schedule shall remain as determined by the Department for
Local Government, regardless of changes in the population estimates
or the actual census count that may occur during the term for which
the coroner has been elected or appointed.
2. a. The salary schedule provides four (4) steps for yearly increments
within each population group. A coroner's salary shall be at a
minimum equal to the amount stated for the first step within the
applicable population group for the first year or portion thereof
the coroner serves in office. Thereafter, on January 1 of each
subsequent year, the coroner's salary shall be advanced
automatically to the next step in the salary schedule for the
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
population group and shall be at a minimum equal to the salary
amount stated for that step.
b. Prior to assuming office, any person assuming the office as a
coroner shall certify to the commissioner of the Department for
Local Government the total number of years, not to exceed four
(4) years, that the person has previously served as a coroner. The
Department for Local Government shall place the coroner in the
proper step based upon a formula of one (1) incremental step per
full calendar year of service:
SALARY SCHEDULE
County Population Steps and Minimum Salary for Coroners
by Group
Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
Group I
0-4,999 $36,000 $37,000 $38,000 $39,500
Group II
5,000-9,999 39,501 40,500 41,500 43,000
Group III
10,000-19,999 43,001 44,500 46,000 48,000
Group IV
20,000-29,999 48,001 49,500 51,000 53,000
Group V
30,000-44,999 53,001 55,000 57,000 60,000
Group VI
45,000-59,999 60,001 62,000 64,000 67,000
Group VII
60,000-89,999 67,001 69,500 72,000 75,500
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
Group VIII
90,000-499,999 75,501 78,000 80,500 84,000
Group IX
500,000 and up 84,001 87,450 90,900 95,335.76
(c) By the second Friday in February of each year, the Department for Local
Government shall adjust the salary schedule in paragraph (b)2.b. of this
subsection accordingly by using the percent increase in the nonseasonally
adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent
calendar years available, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics. Once adjusted, the Department for Local Government shall notify
each fiscal court of the adjusted salary schedule. The adjusted salary
amounts shall be retroactive to the preceding January 1, and shall not
exceed the amount determined by the annual adjustment required under
KRS 64.527.
(d) A coroner holding office on the effective date of this Act shall not receive a
reduction in pay as a result of this subsection.
(e) 1. In addition to the step increases based on service in office, each
coroner shall be paid an annual incentive of one hundred dollars
($100) per calendar year for the completion of the training courses
required in subsection (4) of this section.
2. The coroner shall report all completed training courses to the
Department for Local Government.
3. If a coroner fails, without good cause as determined by the
commissioner of the Department for Local Government, to obtain the
minimum amount of approved training in any year, the coroner shall
lose all training incentives previously accumulated.
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
4. The training incentive provided in subparagraph (e)1. of this
paragraph shall be adjusted by the Department for Local Government
on an annual basis for any increase or decrease in the consumer price
index in the same manner as salaries are adjusted under paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
5. The Department for Local Government may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
establish guidelines for the training incentive and the reporting of
training courses.
(f) All coroners shall be considered full-time workers and a local government
shall not reduce the salary of a coroner below the minimum salary set out in
paragraph (b)2.b. of this subsection due to the hours worked by the coroner.
[ County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
1. 10,000 or less $200
2. 10,001 to 20,000 300
3. 20,001 to 40,000 350
4. 40,001 to 60,000 400
5. 60,001 to 100,000 450
6. 100,001 to 150,000 800
7. 150,001 or more 1,000
(b) Coroners who hold a current certificate of continuing education, issued
jointly by the Department of Criminal Justice Training, Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet, and the Office of the Kentucky State Medical
Examiner, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and who have completed
the course described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall be paid the
following minimum monthly compensation set forth in this subsection
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
in recognition of the training:
County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
1. 10,000 or less $400
2. 10,001 to 20,000 500
3. 20,001 to 40,000 650
4. 40,001 to 60,000 750
5. 60,001 to 100,000 850
6. 100,001 to 150,000 1,100
7. 150,001 or more 1,300]
(2) Deputy coroners who hold a current certificate of continuing education[, as
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section,] and have completed the course
described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall receive out of the county,
consolidated local government, charter county government, urban-county
government, or unified local government treasury, whichever is appropriate, the
monthly compensation the fiscal court of each county shall fix, subject to the
following minimums:
County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
(a) 10,000 or less $200
(b) 10,001 to 20,000 250
(c) 20,001 to 40,000 275
(d) 40,001 to 60,000 300
(e) 60,001 to 100,000 400
(f) 100,001 to 150,000 900
(g) 150,001 or more 1,100
(3) The fiscal court of any county, or the legislative body of a consolidated local
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
government, charter county government, urban-county government, or unified local
government may compensate coroners and deputy coroners an additional amount of
up to three hundred dollars ($300) per month as an expense allowance.
(4) (a) The initial course of continuing education[ required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section] shall consist of a forty (40) hour basic training course prescribed
by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. Annually thereafter the coroner shall
attend and successfully complete at least eighteen (18) hours of approved
training in order to be compensated in accordance with subsection (1)(e)[(b)]
of this section.
(b) Within three (3) years of initially assuming office, in order to be compensated
in accordance with subsections (1)(e)[(b)] and (2) of this section, a coroner or
deputy coroner shall attend and complete a course of at least four (4) hours
provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training that shall include
instruction on the grieving process and best practices for providing a notice of
death to a spouse or next of kin and may include instruction on other similar
topics. A coroner or deputy coroner that has completed the course shall not be
required to retake the course.
(c)[(5)] If a deputy coroner assumes the office of coroner after receiving the
training stipulated in this subsection[section], the deputy coroner shall be
compensated in accordance with[ the compensation schedule set forth in]
subsection (1)(e)[(b)] of this section.
(5)[(6)] The number of deputy coroners in a county shall not exceed one (1) for each
twenty-five thousand (25,000) inhabitants, or fraction thereof, according to the most
recent federal census, but every coroner may, subject to the approval of the
legislative body of the county, consolidated local government, charter county
government, urban-county government, or unified local government, appoint
additional deputy coroners, regardless of population.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1180
Section 2. This Act takes effect January 4, 2027.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:40 PM Jacketed